DI-248

DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROLSUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS
DTC C 1743 /43 AHC Main Relay Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This relay is to supply power source to the suspension control ECU. The relay comes ON a few seconds
after the ignition switch is turned ON.

Trouble Area

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition

Either ofthefollowing 1.,2.0r3. detected:

1.Whenthe condition thatthe IG terminal voltage of ECU is
morethan 10 + 0.5V andthe Bterminalvoltage of ECUis
1.0V orlesswhilethe mainrelay isin drive condition con-
tinued for 0.5 sec.

2. Atfter the condition that the upper reaches voltage of the

C1743/43

main solenoid whenthe mainrelayis ONis2V orless
continuedfor40 + 10msec.andwhenturningthe electric-
ity 1 £ 0.1 sec. later and detecting the short circuit condition

¢« AHC mainrelay
¢ AHC mainrelay circuit
* Suspension control ECU

4 times continuously.

3.Whendetectingthatthe |G terminal voltage of ECU is 10
0.5V ormore whenthe mainrelayis non —drivingandthe
condition that the IG terminal voltage is less than the volt-
age added 4 V to the B terminal voltage of ECU continued
for 2 secs.

I+

Fail safe function:
If a trouble occurs in the AHC main relay circuit, the ECU prohibits the height control and fixed the damping

force at the sports mode.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check AHC main relay operation.

IN CASE OF USING HAND-HELD TESTER:
PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe ACTIVE TEST mode on the hand-held tester.
CHECK:
Check the operation sound of the AHC main relay when operating it with the hand-held tester.
OK:
The operation sound of the AHC main relay should be heard.

Ts IN CASE OF NOT USING HAND-HELD TESTER:
,L PREPARATION:
[T

|

(@ Using SST, connect terminals Ts and CG of DLCS3.
SST 09843-18040

(b) Push the "]DOWN?” button of the height select switch 5
times or more within 5 seconds after turning the ignition
switch ON.

HINT:

rossso| At this time the height control OFF indicator light flashes at 0.25

second intervals.

CHECK:
(@ Change the damping mode select switch to the "SPORT
2” position.

(b) Pushthe "DOWN?” button of the height select switch, then
check the operation sound of the AHC main relay.

OK:
The operation sound of the AHC main relay should be
heard.

"DOWN” Button

F05738
OK Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).
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2 | Check voltage between terminal MRLY of suspension control ECU and body
ground.
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PREPARATION:

F05732

Remove the suspension control ECU with connectors still con-

nected.

CHECK:

(@  Turn the ignition switch ON.

(b) Measure voltage between terminal MRLY of suspension
control ECU and body ground.

OK:
Voltage:9 -14V

@

NG> Check and replace suspension control ECU.

3 | Check AHC main relay.
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Continuity

F05733
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PREPARATION:

(@) Disconnect the AHC main relay connector.

(b) Remove the AHC main relay from suspension control
ECU.

CHECK:

Check continuity between each pair of terminal of motor relay.

OK:

Continuity

Terminals 1 and3
(Referencevalue62 Q)

Terminals 2 and 4 Open

CHECK:
(a) Apply battery voltage betweenterminals 1 and3.
(b)  Check continuity between terminals 2 and 4.

Terminals 2 and 4 | Continuity

NG> Replace AHC main relay.
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4 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between AHC main
relay and battery, suspension control ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).
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